Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2248.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Jimmy Stewart was born May 20, 1908, in Indiana, Pennsylvania.(2) Jimmy Stewart attended high school at Mercersburg Academy, in Mercersburg, Pennsylvania, where he played football and was a member of the glee club and the drama club.(3) Jimmy Stewart entered Princeton University in 1928, graduating with a degree in architecture.(4) After graduating from Princeton University, Jimmy Stewart joined the University Players, a theater group in 12345678910111213141516 West Falmouth, Massachusetts.(5) Jimmy Stewart often played a man of modest means, with moral resolve, striving to overcome his position in life to reach his dreams.(6) Jimmy Stewart's slow, halting line delivery and naive, engaging manner was quickly accepted by the moviegoing public.(7) In 1939, Jimmy Stewart's portrayal of a shy, idealistic young senator fighting corruption in Congress in "Mr. Smith Goes to Washington" won him the New York Film Critics best actor award and gave him his first Academy Award nomination.(8) Jimmy Stewart is best remembered for his role in the 1946 sentimental holiday favorite, "It's a Wonderful Life," in which he plays the embittered idealist, George Bailey, a decent, small-town citizen.(9) In 1940, Jimmy Stewart won an Academy Award, performing in "The Philadelphia Story" with Katharine Hepburn and Cary Grant.(10) In 1941, Jimmy Stewart enlisted in the United States Army and was assigned to the United States Army Air Corps.(11) In 1943, Jimmy Stewart was sent to Europe as commander of a bomber squadron and awarded the Air Medal and the Distinguished Flying Cross.(12) During the late 1940s, Jimmy Stewart enjoyed success on Broadway as the ingratiating inebriate Elwood P. Dowd, whose best friend was an invisible six-foot rabbit in "Harvey."(13) The play "Harvey" was adapted for the movie screen 20260HB2248PN2939 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in 1950, earning another Academy Award nomination for Stewart.(14) Jimmy Stewart received an Honorary Academy Award in 1985 for, as the Academy noted, "his 50 years of meaningful performances, for his high ideals, both on and off the screen, with the respect and affection of his colleagues."(15) In 1985, Jimmy Stewart was awarded the Presidential Medal of Freedom, the nation's highest civilian honor.(16) In 1995, Jimmy Stewart was honored when The Jimmy Stewart Museum opened in his hometown of Indiana, Pennsylvania.(17) Jimmy Stewart was one of Hollywood's most respected and admired stars during his nearly 50-year-long movie career.(18) Jimmy Stewart died July 2, 1997, at his home in Beverly Hills, California.Section 2. Designation.May 20 of each year shall be recognized as "Jimmy Stewart Day" in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed as requiring an employer to treat "Jimmy Stewart Day" as a legal or official holiday or to provide paid leave to an employee on "Jimmy Stewart Day" solely by virtue of the date being recognized under this act.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2248PN2939 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627